Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,137
Continuing competency; limited exemption.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may waive continuing competency requirements, in part or in total, for any two-year licensing period when a licensee submits documentation that circumstances beyond his or her control prevented completion of such requirements as provided in section 38-146. In addition to circumstances determined by the department to be beyond the licensee's control pursuant to such section, a nail technology instructor who meets the continuing competency requirements for the nail technology instructor's license shall be exempt from meeting the continuing competency requirements for his or her nail technician license for that biennium.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 55;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 53;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,206;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 399.